Massachusetts, session 194th, H723.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Chapter 71 of General Laws is hereby amended adding the following section:
Section 2. Every school district and school shall include in its curriculum a unit of
instruction studying the events of Black History, including the history of the African slave trade,
slavery in America, and the vestiges of slavery in this country. These events shall include not
only the contributions made by individual African-Americans in government and in the arts,
humanities, and sciences to the economic, cultural and political development of the United States
and Africa, but also the socio-economic struggle which African-Americans experienced
collectively in striving to achieve fair and equal treatment under the laws of this nation. The
studying of this material shall constitute an affirmation by students of their commitment to
respect the dignity of all races and peoples and to forever eschew every form of discrimination in
of 2

their lives and careers. The Department of Education and Secondary Education may prepare and
make available to all school districts and schools instructional materials, which may be used as
guidelines for development of a unit of instruction under this Section; provided, however, that
each school district and school shall itself determine the minimum amount of instruction time
which shall qualify as a unit of instruction satisfying the requirements of this Section. A school
may meet the requirements of this Section through an online program or course.
Section 3. Public community colleges, colleges and universities shall offer a course
studying the events of Black History, including the history of the African slave trade, slavery in
America, and the vestiges of slavery in this country. These events shall include not only the
contributions made by individual African-Americans in government and in the arts, humanities,
and sciences to the economic, cultural, and political development of the United States and
Africa, but also the socio-economic struggle that African-Americans experienced collectively in
striving to achieve fair and equal treatment under the laws of this nation. The taking of this
course shall constitute an affirmation by students of their commitment to respect the dignity of
all races and peoples and to forever eschew every form of discrimination in their lives and
careers.
Public community colleges, colleges and universities may meet the requirements of this
Section by offering an online course.
of 2